Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Library, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,900,626.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $311,368
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts other
than those described in section 3 of this 2023 Act, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,142,832 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  from moneys received from the assessment against state agencies de-
scribed in ORS 357.203 and transferred to the Miscellaneous Receipts Account for the State
Library.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,273,204 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 2